test/src/morphology/N-aliiz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - alīz: # Noun 203 'eng /est alus/fin' - full paradigm
     alīz+N+Sg+Nom: alīz
     alīz+N+Sg+Gen: alīz
     alīz+N+Sg+Par: alīzt
     alīz+N+Sg+Dat: alīzõn
     alīz+N+Sg+Ins: alīzõks
     alīz+N+Sg+Ill: alīzõ
     alīz+N+Sg+Ela: alīzõst
     alīz+N+Pl+Nom: alīzt
     alīz+N+Pl+Gen: alīzt
     alīz+N+Pl+Par: alīži
     alīz+N+Pl+Dat: alīztõn
     alīz+N+Pl+Ins: alīztõks
     alīz+N+Pl+Ill: alīžiz
     alīz+N+Pl+Ela: alīžist
